Wisconsin, session 2025, SB62.
do enact as follows:SB62,11Section 1. 231.02 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB62,3,22231.02 (2) The authority shall appoint an executive director and associate 3executive director who shall not be members of the authority and who shall serve at 4the pleasure of the authority. They shall receive such compensation as the 5authority fixes, except that the compensation of the executive director shall not 6exceed the maximum of the salary range established under s. 20.923 (1) for 7positions assigned to executive salary group 6 8 and the compensation of each 8other employee of the authority shall not exceed the maximum of the salary range 9established under s. 20.923 (1) for positions assigned to executive salary group 3 5. 10The executive director or associate executive director or other person designated by 11resolution of the authority shall keep a record of the proceedings of the authority 12and shall be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the authority, 13the minute book or journal of the authority, and its official seal. The executive 14director or associate executive director or other person may cause copies to be made 15of all minutes and other records and documents of the authority and may give 16certificates under the official seal of the authority to the effect that such copies are 1true copies, and all persons dealing with the authority may rely upon such 2certificates.SB62,23Section 2. 231.03 (6) (L) of the statutes is created to read:SB62,3,94231.03 (6) (L) In an amount not to exceed that approved by the authority, 5finance working capital of any participating health institution, participating 6educational institution, participating nonprofit institution, or participating 7research institution for the purpose of covering operating expenses. Bonds issued 8for purposes of this paragraph are not exempt from taxation under s. 71.05 (1) (c) 914., 71.26 (1m) (o), or 71.45 (1t) (n).SB62,310Section 3. 231.03 (13) of the statutes is amended to read:SB62,4,211231.03 (13) Make loans to any participating health institution, participating 12educational institution, participating nonprofit institution, or participating 13research institution for the cost of a project or to finance working capital under sub. 14(6) (L) in accordance with an agreement between the authority and the 15participating health institution, participating educational institution, participating 16nonprofit institution, or participating research institution. The authority may 17secure the loan by a mortgage or other security arrangement on the health facility, 18educational facility, nonprofit facility, or research facility granted by the 19participating health institution, participating educational institution, participating 20nonprofit institution, or participating research institution to the authority. The 21loan may not exceed, as applicable, the total cost of the project as determined by the 22participating health institution, participating educational institution, participating 23nonprofit institution, or participating research institution and approved by the 1authority or the amount of working capital approved by the authority under sub. (6) 2(L).SB62,43Section 4. 231.08 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:SB62,4,84231.08 (8) The proceeds of a bond issued under this section may be used for a 5project in this state or any other state, except that if the proceeds of a bond are used 6for a project located in another state, that project shall include a substantial 7component located in this state, as determined by the executive director the owner 8or operator of that project, or its affiliate, shall have a presence in this state.SB62,4,99